hps/hps.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                     HPS by FST                    !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!noun : /n
!josa : /j


Multichar_Symbols   /j /n


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root
        noun ;! 일반명사



LEXICON noun !일반명사
이성친구/n	nNext;
이성동료/n	nNext;

LEXICON josa !조사
을/j	jNext;
이/j	jNext;
는/j	jNext;
로/j	jNext;
만/j	jNext;
은/j	jNext;
가/j	jNext;
과/j	jNext;
와/j	jNext;
도/j	jNext;
들/j	jNext;

LEXICON nNext
        josa;
        finLexicon;

LEXICON jNext
        finLexicon;

LEXICON finLexicon
     # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!! End of Document !!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
